North Dakota, session 69, HB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-16.1-38 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
61-16.1-38. Permit to construct or modify dam, dike, or other device required -
Penalty - Emergency.
1. Dikes, dams, or other devices for water conservation, flood control regulation,
watershed improvement, or water storage must be constructed in accordance with this
chapter. A permit is required from the department for the construction of a:
a. A low-hazard dam or other device capable of retaining, obstructing, or diverting
more than fifty acre-feet [61674.08 cubic meters] of water; a
b. A medium-hazard or high-hazard dam capable of retaining, obstructing, or
diverting more than twenty-five acre-feet [30837.04 cubic meters] of water; an
c. An agricultural dike capable of protecting more than eighty acres [32.37 hectares]
of land area; or any
d. Any dike capable of protecting an occupied residence or structure or public
infrastructure.
2. A permit application for the construction of any dike, dam, or other device, along with
complete plans and specifications, must be submitted to the department of water
resources. Except for low-hazard dams less than ten feet [3.05 meters] in height,
agricultural dikes, or a farmstead ring dike, the plans and specifications must be
Page No. 1 25.1067.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
completed by a professional engineer. The professional engineer must be registered in
this state. The department shall consider the application in such detail as the
department deems necessary and proper. The department shall refuse to allow the
construction of any unsafe or improper dike, dam, or other device that would interfere
with the orderly control of the water resources of the district, or may order changes,
conditions, or modifications as in the department's judgment may be necessary for
safety or the protection of property.
3. Within forty-five days after application receipt, except in unique or complex situations,
the department shall complete the initial review of the application and forward the
application, along with any changes, conditions, or modifications, to the water
resource board of the district within which the contemplated project is located. The
board shall consider the application within forty-five days, and suggest any changes,
conditions, or modifications to the department. If the board approves the application,
the board shall forward the approved application to the department. If the board fails to
respond within forty-five days, the board will be deemed to have no changes,
conditions, or modifications to make.
4. The department shall make the final decision on the application andwithin one
hundred twenty days after the department receives a completed application. The
department shall forward that decision to the applicant and the local water resource
board. If the department fails to approve the permit application within that period, the
permit is approved with no conditions. The department may issue temporary permits
for dikes, dams, or other devices in cases of an emergency.
5. Any person constructing a dam, dike, or other device without first securing a
necessary permit, as required by this section, is liable for all damages proximately
caused by the dam, dike, or other device, and is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 61-16.1-53.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The board shall make the decision required by section 61-16.1-53 within a reasonable
time, not exceeding one hundred twenty days, after receiving the complaint. The board
shall notify all parties of its decision by certified mail. Any aggrieved party may appeal
the board's decision to the department of water resources. The appeal to the
Page No. 2 25.1067.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
department must be made within thirty days from the date notice of the board's
decision has been received. The appeal must be made by submitting a written notice
to the department which must state specifically the reason why the board's decision is
erroneous. The appealing party also shall submit copies of the written appeal notice to
the board and to all nonappealing parties. Upon receipt of this notice the board, if it
has ordered removal of a dam, dike, or other device, is relieved of its obligation to
procure the removal of the dam, dike, or other device. The department shall handle
the appeal by conducting an independent investigation and making an independent
determination of the matter. The department may enter property affected by the
complaint to investigate the complaint. The department shall make a decision on an
appeal within a reasonable time, not exceeding one hundred twenty days from the
department's receipt of the appeal. If the department fails to make a decision on an
appeal within that period, the appeal is denied.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 61-32-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
61-32-03. Permit to drain waters required - Penalty.
1. Any person, before draining a pond, slough, lake, or sheetwater, or any series thereof,
which has a watershed area comprising eighty acres [32.37 hectares] or more, shall
first secure a permit to do so. The permit application must be submitted to the
department of water resources. TheWithin one hundred twenty days after the
department receives a completed application, the department shall refer the
application to the water resource district or districts within which is found a majority of
the watershed or drainage area of the pond, slough, lake, or sheetwater for
consideration and approval, but the department may require applications proposing
drainage of statewide or interdistrict significance be returned to the department for
final approval. If the department fails to refer the application within one hundred twenty
days, the water resource district or districts within which is found a majority of the
watershed or drainage area may consider and approve the application, with
reasonable conditions.
2. A permit may not be granted until an investigation discloses the quantity of water
which will be drained from the pond, slough, lake, or sheetwater, or any series of those
Page No. 3 25.1067.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
water bodies, will not flood or adversely affect downstream lands. If the investigation
shows the proposed drainage will flood or adversely affect lands of downstream
landowners, the water resource board may not issue a permit until flowage easements
are obtained. The flowage easements must be filed for record in the office of the
recorder of the county or counties in which the lands are situated. An owner of land
proposing to drain shall undertake and agree to pay the expenses incurred in making
the required investigation. This section does not apply to the construction or
maintenance of any existing or prospective drain constructed under the supervision of
a state or federal agency, as determined by the department of water resources.
3. Any person draining, or causing to be drained, a pond, slough, lake, or sheetwater, or
any series of those water bodies, which has a watershed area comprising eighty acres
[32.37 hectares] or more, without first securing a permit to do so, as provided by this
section, is liable for all damage sustained by any person caused by the draining, and
is guilty of an infraction.
4. As used in this section, sheetwater means shallow water that floods land not normally
subject to standing water.
5. The department of water resources may adopt rules for temporary permits for
emergency drainage.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 61-32-08 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The board shall make the decision required by section 61-32-07 within a reasonable
time, but not to exceed one hundred twenty days, after receiving the complaint. The
board shall notify all parties of its decision by certified mail. Any aggrieved party may
appeal the board's decision to the department of water resources. The appeal to the
department must be made within thirty days from the date notice of the board's
decision has been received. The appeal must be made by submitting a written notice
to the department, and the notice must specify the reason why the board's decision is
erroneous. The appealing party also shall submit copies of the written appeal notice to
the board and to all nonappealing parties. Upon receipt of this notice the board, if it
has ordered closure of a drain, lateral drain, or ditch, is relieved of its obligation to
procure the closing or filling of the drain, lateral drain, or ditch. The department shall
Page No. 4 25.1067.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
handle the appeal by conducting an independent investigation and making an
independent determination of the matter. The department may enter property affected
by the complaint to investigate the complaint. The department shall make a decision
on an appeal within a reasonable time, not exceeding one hundred twenty days from
the department's receipt of the appeal. If the department fails to make a decision on
an appeal within that period, the appeal is denied.
Page No. 5 25.1067.01000